Hawaii statutes.
§576B-607 Contest of registration or
enforcement. (a) A party contesting the validity or enforcement of a
registered support order or seeking to vacate the registration has the burden
of proving one or more of the following defenses:

(1) The issuing tribunal lacked personal jurisdiction
over the contesting party;

(2) The order was obtained by fraud;

(3) The order has been vacated, suspended, or
modified by a later order;

(4) The issuing tribunal has stayed the order pending
appeal;

(5) There is a defense under the law of this State to
the remedy sought;

(6) Full or partial payment has been made;

(7) The statute of limitation under section 576B-604
precludes enforcement of some or all of the alleged arrearages; or

(8) The alleged controlling order is not the
controlling order.

(b) If a party presents evidence establishing
a full or partial defense under subsection (a), a tribunal may stay enforcement
of a registered support order, continue the proceeding to permit production of
additional relevant evidence, and issue other appropriate orders. An
uncontested portion of the registered support order may be enforced by all
remedies available under the law of this State.

(c) If the contesting party does not establish
a defense under subsection (a) to the validity or enforcement of a registered
support order, the registering tribunal shall issue an order confirming the
order. [L 1997, c 295, pt of §1; am L 2015, c 77, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next